Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-733
Advertising or promotional materials; state funds; limitation.

Beginning January 1 of the year in which the Governor is elected and continuing through the day of the general election during such year, no state funds shall be used for any radio, television, or print media advertising or promotional materials which refer to any one or more of the following state officeholders by name: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, or Auditor of Public Accounts.

Laws 2002, LB 1086, § 1.